North Carolina, session 2025, SB929.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Forsyth County to be allocated to Habitat
for Humanity of Forsyth County, Inc., for use in constructing affordable housing in Forsyth
County and the City of Winston-Salem.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S929-v-1*